Washington statutes.
RCW 35.01.010

First-class city.

A first-class city is a city with a population of ten thousand or more at the time of its organization or reorganization that has a charter adopted under Article XI, section 10, of the state Constitution.

[ 1994 c 81 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.01.010. Prior: 1955 c 319 s 2; prior: (i) 1890 p 140 s 11, part; RRS s 8932, part. (ii) 1907 c 248 s 1, part; 1890 p 140 s 12, part; RRS s 8933, part.]